West Virginia, session 2025, SB255.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION §18-2-25f. Participation in non-school athletic activities. The Legislature hereby finds that: (1) While participation in school sponsored extracurricular sports is a voluntary opportunity, no student-athlete should be deprived of additional opportunities to advance or showcase their skills purely because they are playing for a school sports team;(2) Prohibiting a student-athlete from participating in non-school sponsored events or activities as a condition for participation on a school-sponsored team is unlawfully arbitrary and is not rationally related to a state purpose; and(3) A county board of education and the West Virginia Secondary School Activities Commission may not restrict nor prohibit a student from competing in non-school events or participating on non-school competitive teams as a condition of playing for a school extracurricular activity or sport.